Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.100

Pension funding council—Created.

(1) The pension funding council is hereby created. The council consists of the:

(a) Director of the department of retirement systems;

(b) Director of the office of financial management;

(c) Chair and ranking minority member of the house of representatives appropriations committee; and

(d) Chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee.

The council may select officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The pension funding council shall adopt changes to economic assumptions and contribution rates by an affirmative vote of at least four members.

[ 1998 c 283 s 2.]